Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 5

Older Neighborhood Preservation Act

13-5-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Older Neighborhood Preservation Act.”

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Revitalizing Urban Cities: Linking the Past to the Present, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 973 (2016).

Saving Our Cities: Land Banking in Tennessee, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 927 (2016).

13-5-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dwelling unit” means a structure or the part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one (1) person who maintains a household or by two (2) or more persons who maintain a common household;

“Older residential neighborhood” means an area where a majority of the residential property was constructed fifty (50) years or more prior to April 22, 2004;

“Owner” means one (1) or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is vested:

All or part of the legal title to property; or

All or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to the present use and enjoyment of the premises;

“Residential real property” means a building located in an older residential neighborhood consisting of one (1) dwelling unit in which the owner of the real property resides as the owner's principal place of residence;

“Residential rental property” means a building or structure located in an older residential neighborhood containing one (1) or two (2) dwelling units that are rented; and

“Substandard residential rental property” means residential rental property where the dwelling unit or improvements within the dwelling unit, which by reason of dilapidation, obsolescence, faulty arrangement or design, lack of ventilation, light and sanitary facilities, deleterious land use, or obsolete layout, or any combination of these or other factors, are detrimental to the safety, health, morals, or welfare of the community.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 2.

13-5-103. Creation of grant program by municipality or county.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body, a municipality or county may create a grant program for the revitalization of substandard residential rental property located in an older residential neighborhood and may also create a grant program for the revitalization of residential real property located in an older residential neighborhood.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 3.

13-5-104. Basis for grant programs.

The grant programs shall be based on the estimated expense of renovating the property to property that is decent, safe and sanitary and that meets all local building and housing codes concerning fitness for habitation. The resolution establishing the grant program or programs shall at a minimum:

For grants for substandard residential rental property:

Identify the neighborhoods or portions of neighborhoods that contain substandard residential rental property for which a grant program is created; and

Establish the criteria for renovation and rehabilitation of substandard residential rental property;

For grants for the renovation or rehabilitation of residential real property:

Identify the neighborhoods or portions of neighborhoods where a majority of the residential real property is such that the property values of the neighborhood are adversely affected by the condition of the housing stock; and

Establish the criteria for renovation and rehabilitation of such residential real property;

Establish an application and appeal process for such grants; such application process shall require that all owners of the property, or their legal representatives, to which the grant applies sign the grant application;

Determine the maximum amount for a grant under each program;

Set the time period in which the grant shall be used; the programs shall include a mechanism for funds to revert back if funds included in the grant are not expended; and

Develop a system of verification and accounting to ensure that the funds are being accurately utilized to rehabilitate the dwelling unit.

The resolution establishing a grant program or programs may establish penalties in addition to those included in § 13-5-107 for failure to utilize grant funds in accordance with the program developed by the municipality or county.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 4.

13-5-105. Public hearing.

Before the legislative body adopts such a resolution establishing a grant program or programs, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing relating to the proposal, after publishing a notice of such public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality or county at least two (2) weeks prior to the date of such public hearing. Such notice shall include the time, place and purpose of the public hearing.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 5.

13-5-106. Approval across jurisdictions.

If residential rental property or residential real property lies in more than one (1) taxing jurisdiction that has created a grant program under this chapter, approval for a grant by one (1) jurisdiction does not automatically establish approval for a grant in such other jurisdiction.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 6.

13-5-107. Penalties for failure to use grant funds according to program.

It is theft of property punishable as provided in § 39-14-105 to knowingly fail to utilize grant funds in accordance with the program developed by the municipality or county.

Acts 2004, ch. 536, § 7.